sk-SK: Zamýšľaný povrch: Posteľ; Stolička; Podlahový; Viacúčelový; WC; Invalidný vozík; Iné
sl-SI: Predvidena površina: Postelja; Stol; Tla; Večnamenska; Stranišče; Invalidski voziček; Drugo
hu: Tervezett felület: Ágy; Szék; Padlóra szerelhető; Többcélú; WC; Kerekesszék; Egyéb
ru: Предполагаемая поверхность: Кровать; Стул; Напольный; Многоцелевой; Туалет; Инвалидная коляска; Другой
hr-HR: Namijenjena površina: Krevet; Stolica; Pod; Višenamjensko; Toalet; Invalidska kolica; Ostalo
ko: 사용 표면: 침대; 의자; 바닥; 다목적; 화장실; 휠체어; 기타
it: Superficie prevista: Letto; Sedia; Pavimento; Multiuso; Toilette; Sedia a rotelle; Altro
lt-LT: Numatytas paviršius: Lova; Kėdė; Grindiniai; Daugiafunkcis; Tualetas; Neįgaliojo vežimėlis; Kita
fr: Surface prévue: Lit; Chaise; Sol; Polyvalent; Toilettes; Fauteuil roulant; Autre
es: Superficie prevista: Cama; Silla; Suelo; Multiusos; Aseo; Silla de ruedas; Otros
ro-RO: Suprafață destinată: Pat; Scaun; Podea; Multifuncțional; Toaletă; Scaun cu rotile; Altele
ja: 対象表面: ベッド; 椅子; 床; マルチパーパス; トイレ; 車椅子; その他
th: พื้นผิวที่ตั้งใจใช้: เตียง; เก้าอี้; พื้น; อเนกประสงค์; สุขา; รถเข็น; อื่นๆ
cs: Zamýšlený povrch: Postel; Židle; Podlaha; Pro více účelů; Záchod; Invalidní vozík; Jiné
da: Tilsigtet overflade: Seng; Stol; Gulv; Multi-formål; Toilet; Kørestol; Andet
pt-BR: Superfície pretendida: Cama; Cadeira; Piso; Multiuso; Banheiro; Cadeira de rodas; Outro
pl: Docelowa powierzchnia: Łóżko; Przewodniczący; Podłoga; Wielofunkcyjne; Toaleta; Wózek inwalidzki; Inne
pt-PT: Superfície pretendida: Cama; Cadeira; De chão; Multiuso; WC; Cadeira de rodas; Outro
el: Προοριζόμενη επιφάνεια: Κρεβάτι; Καρέκλα; Δαπέδου; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Τουαλέτα; Αναπηρικό αμαξίδιο; Άλλο
tr: Hedeflenen yüzey: Yatak; Sandalye; Zemin; Çok amaçlı; Tuvalet; Tekerlekli sandalye; Diğer
vi: Bề mặt dự định: Giường; Cái ghế; Sàn nhà; Đa mục đích; Phòng vệ sinh; Xe lăn; Khác
sv: Avsedd yta: Säng; Stol; Golv; Multifunktionell; Toalett; Rullstol; Övrigt
bg-BG: Предназначена повърхност: Легло; Стол; Под; Многоцелеви; Тоалетна; Инвалидна количка; Други
nb: Tiltenkt overflate: Seng; Stol; Gulv; Flerbruk; Toalett; Rullestol; Annet
de: Vorgesehene Oberfläche: Bett; Stuhl; Boden; Mehrzweck; Toilette; Rollstuhl; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 目标表面: 床; 椅子; 地板; 多用途; 洗手间; 轮椅; 其他
fi: Tarkoitettu pinta: Sänky; Tuoli; Lattia; Monikäyttöinen; WC; Pyörätuoli; Muu
zh-TW: 預期表面: 床; 椅子; 地板; 多用途; 洗手間; 輪椅; 其他
nl: Beoogd oppervlak: Bed; Stoel; Vloer; Multifunctioneel; Toilet; Rolstoel; Andere
en: Intended surface: Bed; Chair; Floor; Multi-purpose; Toilet; Wheelchair; Other